West Virginia, session 2025, HB2899.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. §5B-2-22. Legislative oversight committee on aviation development. (a) The Legislative Oversight Committee on Aviation Development is hereby created to oversee the implementation of legislation intended to improve aviation development in the state. (b) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates shall each designate five members of their respective houses, at least one of whom shall be a member of the minority party, to serve on the legislative oversight committee. This oversight committee shall report regularly at each legislative session on the implementation of the purposes set forth in this section. It shall regularly investigate all matters relating to trends and technologies driving innovation in the field of aviation, comprehensive strategies to promote the research and development of aviation technologies, and the economic impact of aviation development in the state. In the performance of its duties, the oversight committee may contract with aviation and aeronautics experts to study these issues in appropriate depth and perspective.(c) The oversight committee shall annually recommend to the Legislature the needs of the state relating to aviation and aeronautics development and the funding required to execute these functions. It shall meet regularly with the Department of Economic Development and the Division of Multimodal Transportation Facilities to determine what may be required for implementation of legislation relating to the state's aviation and aeronautics development, establishment of airports and air navigation facilities, and any other related matters which benefit the state.